Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.03
Office of Chief Information Officer; division of communications; creation; Director of Communications; appointment; qualifications.

There is hereby created, within the office of Chief Information Officer, a division of communications to be headed by the Director of Communications. The Chief Information Officer shall appoint as Director of Communications any person who has not less than six years' experience in a position or positions which include responsibility for management, purchase, lease, or control of communications for a private or governmental enterprise. No person shall hold the position of director who is directly or indirectly interested in any communications common carrier or other company engaged in the furnishing of communications services or facilities, but investment in stock of a communications common carrier in an amount determined by the Chief Information Officer to be not significant shall not be considered disqualifying.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 3, p. 1880;

Laws 1971, LB 675, § 4;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 893, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 7.